lt-LT: Kepimo prekių paskirtis: Sausainiai; Duona; Šokoladainis; Morkų pyragas; Sūrio pyragas; Šokoladinis pyragas; Pyragaičiai; Trupininis; Crème brûlée; Meduoliai; Makarunai; Morengas; Dribsnių batonėliai; Mafinai; Blynai; Pyrago pluta; Picos tešla; Kaimiška duona; Trapios tešlos sausainiai; Vafliai; Kita
tr: Pişirme Amacı: Bisküvi; Ekmek; Brownie; Havuçlu kek; Cheesecake; Çikolatalı kek; Kurabiyeler; Ufalama; Krem brûlée; Zencefilli çörek; Makaron; Beze; Müsli barlar; Mafin; Pankek; Turta kabuğu; Pizza hamuru; Rustik ekmek; Galeta; Waffle; Diğer
ro-RO: Scop copt: Biscuiți; Pâine; Negrese; Tort cu morcovi; Cheesecake; Prăjitură cu ciocolată; Fursecuri; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Turtă dulce; Macaroons; Bezea; Batoane cu muesli; Brioșe; Clătite; Foaie de plăcintă; Aluat de pizza; Pâine rustică; Biscuiți Shortbread; Vafe; Altele
vi: Mục đích nướng bánh: Bánh quy; Bánh mỳ; Bánh brownie; Bánh cà rốt; Bánh phô mai; Bánh sô cô la; Bánh quy; Nghiền nát ra; Kem brûlée; Bánh gừng; Bánh hạnh nhân; Bánh trứng đường meringue; Bánh ngũ cốc muesli; Bánh muffin; Bánh kếp; Vỏ bánh nướng; Bột bánh pizza; Bánh mì thô nướng nồi gan; Bánh quy bơ giòn; Bánh quế; Khác
hr-HR: Svrha pečenja: Keksi; Kruh; Brownie; Kolač od mrkve; Torta od sira; Čokoladna torta; Kolačići; Drobljenac; Crème brûlée; Medenjak; Makroni; Meringa; Energetske pločice; Muffini; Palačinke; Kora za pitu; Tijesto za pizzu; Rustikalni kruh; Prhko tijesto; Vafli; Ostalo
hu: Sütés célja: Keksz; Kenyér; Brownie; Répatorta; Sajttorta; Csokoládétorta; Aprósütemény; Morzsasütemény; Crème brûlée; Mézeskalács; Macaron; Habcsók; Müzliszelet; Muffin; Palacsinta; Pitetészta; Pizzatészta; Rusztikus kenyér; Omlós tészta; Gofri; Egyéb
en: Baking purpose: Biscuits; Bread; Brownies; Carrot cake; Cheesecake; Chocolate cake; Cookies; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Gingerbread; Macaroons; Meringue; Muesli bars; Muffins; Pancakes; Pie crust; Pizza dough; Rustic bread; Shortbread; Waffles; Other
nb: Bakeformål: Kjeks; Brød; Brownies; Gulrotkake; Ostekake; Sjokoladekake; Småkaker; Smuldre; Crème brûlée; Pepperkaker; Makroner; Marengs; Müslibarer; Muffins; Pannekaker; Paiskorpe; Pizzadeig; Rustikkbrød; Sandkake; Vafler; Annen
da: Bageformål: Kiks; Brød; Brownies; Gulerodskage; Cheesecake; Chokoladekage; Småkager; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Honningkage; Makroner; Marengs; Müslibarer; Muffins; Pandekager; Tærtedej; Pizzadej; Rustikt brød; Sandkage; Vafler; Andet
sv: Bakverk: Kex; Bröd; Brownies; Morotskaka; Cheesecake; Chokladtårta; Kakor; Smulpaj; Crème brûlée; Pepparkaka; Macarons; Maräng; Müslibar; Muffins; Pannkakor; Pajskal; Pizzadeg; Rustikt bröd; Mörbakelse; Våfflor; Annat
cs: Účel pečení: Sušenky; Chléb; Brownies; Mrkvový koláč; Tvarohový koláč; Čokoládový dort; Sušenky; Krambl; Crème brûlée; Perník; Makronky; Sněhová pusinka; Müsli tyčinky; Koláče; Palačinky; Korpus na koláč; Těsto na pizzu; Rustikální chléb; Máslová sušenka; Vafle; Jiné
fr: Objectif de cuisson: Biscuits; Pain; Brownies; Gâteau à la carotte; Cheesecake; Gâteau au chocolat; Cookies; Émietter; Crème brûlée; Pain d'épice; Macarons; Meringue; Barres de muesli; Muffins; Pancakes; Pâte à tarte; pâte à pizza; Pain de campagne; sables; Gaufres; Autre
pl: Cel pieczenia: Ciasteczka; Chleb; Brownie; Ciasto marchewkowe; Sernik; Ciasto czekoladowe; Ciastka; Kruszonka; Crème brûlée; Piernik; Makaroniki; Beza; Batoniki musli; Muffiny; Naleśniki; Ciasto kruche; Ciasto na pizzę; Chleb wiejski; Bułka maślana; Gofry; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Účel pečenia: Sušienky; Chlieb; Brownies; Mrkvový koláč; Tvarohový koláč; Čokoládová torta; Cookies; Koláč s posýpkou; Crème brûlée; Medovník; Makrónky; Pusinka; Müsli tyčinky; Muffiny; Palacinky; Krehké cesto na koláč; Cesto na pizzu; Rustikálny chlieb; Krehké pečivo; Vafle; Iné
fi: Leipomisen tarkoitus: Keksit; Leipä; Bronwiet; Porkkanakakku; Juustokakku; Suklaakakku; Keksit; Muru; Paahtovanukas; Piparkakku; Macaronit; Marenki; Myslipatukat; Muffinit; Pannukakut; Piirakkapohja; Pizzataikina; Maalaismainen leipä; Murokeksi; Vohvelit; Muu
nl: Doel van het bakken: Koekjes; Brood; Brownies; Worteltaart; Cheesecake; Chocoladecake; Koekjes; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Ontbijtkoek; Bitterkoekjes; Meringue; Mueslirepen; Muffins; Pannenkoeken; Taartkorst; Pizzadeeg; Rustiek brood; Zandkoekjes; Wafels; Andere
zh-TW: 烘焙用途: 餅乾; 麵包; 布朗尼; 紅蘿蔔蛋糕; 乳酪蛋糕; 巧克力蛋糕; 餅乾; 酥皮甜點; 法式烤布蕾; 薑餅; 馬卡龍; 蛋白霜; 能量棒; 瑪芬鬆餅; 煎餅; 派皮; 披薩麵團; 歐式麵包; 奶油酥餅; 鬆餅; 其他
ja: 製菓用途: ビスケット; パン; ブラウニー; キャロットケーキ; チーズケーキ; チョコレートケーキ; クッキー; クランブル; クレームブリュレ; ジンジャーブレッド; マカロン; メレンゲ; ミューズリーバー; マフィン; パンケーキ; パイ生地; ピザ生地; 田舎風パン; ショートブレッド; ワッフル; その他
pt-PT: Propósito de cozinhar: Bolachas; Pão; Brownies; Bolo de cenoura; Cheesecake; Bolo de chocolate; Bolachas; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Biscoito de gengibre; Macaroons; Merengue; Barras de Muesli; Queque; Panquecas; Massa de tarte; Massa de pizza; Pão rústico; Biscoito amanteigado; Waffles; Outro
es: Uso en repostería: Galletas; Pan; Bizcochos de chocolate; Pastel de zanahoria; Tarta de queso; Pastel de chocolate; Galletas; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Pan de jengibre; Macarrones; Merengue; Barrita de muesli; Magdalenas; Panqueques; Corteza de pastel; Masa de pizza; Pan rústico; Pan de molde; Waffles; Otros
sl-SI: Namen peke: Kruhki; Kruh; Rjavčki; Korenčkova torta; Cheesecake; Čokoladna torta; Piškoti; Drobljenec; Crème brûlée; Medenjaki; Makroni; Meringa; Müsli ploščice; Mafini; Palačinke; Skorja za pito; Testo za pico; Rustikalni kruh; Krhko pecivo; Vaflji; Drugo
de: Backzweck: Kekse; Brot; Brownies; Karottenkuchen; Käsekuchen; Schokoladenkuchen; Plätzchen; Crumble; Crème Brûlée; Lebkuchen; Makronen; Baiser; Müsliriegel; Muffins; Pfannkuchen; Kuchenboden; Pizzateig; Rustikales Brot; Shortbread; Waffeln; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Finalidade de cozimento: Biscoitos; Pão; Brownies; Bolo de cenoura; Cheesecake; Bolo de chocolate; Biscoitos; Crumble; Crème brûlée; Biscoito de gengibre; Macarrons; Merengue; Barra de muesli; Muffins; Panquecas; Massa de torta; Massa de pizza; Pão rústico; Shortbread; Waffles; Outro
zh-CN: 烘焙目的: 饼干; 面包; 布朗尼; 胡萝卜蛋糕; 乳酪蛋糕; 巧克力蛋糕; 饼干/曲奇; 酥皮点心; 焦糖炖蛋; 姜饼; 马卡龙; 蛋白酥饼; 麦片棒; 松饼; 薄煎饼; 馅饼皮; 披萨面团; 乡村面包; 酥饼; 华夫饼干; 其他
it: Tipo di preparazione: Biscotti; Pane; Brownie; Torta di carote; Cheesecake; Torta al cioccolato; Biscotti; Crumble; Creme brulee; Pan di zenzero; Amaretti; Meringa; Barrette di muesli; Muffin; Pancake; Crostata; impasto per pizza; Pane rustico; Shortbread; Waffle; Altro
th: วัตถุประสงค์ในการอบ: บิสกิต; ขนมปัง; บราวนี; เค้กแครอท; รสชีสเค้ก; เค้กช็อกโกแลต; คุกกี้; ครัมเบิ้ล; เครมบรูเล่; รสขนมปังขิง; มาการูน; เมอแรงค์; มูสลี่บาร์; มัฟฟิน; แพนเค้ก; พายร่วน; แป้งโดว์พิซซ่า; รัสติกเบรด; ชอร์ตเบรด; วาฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Цел на печене: Бисквити; Хляб; Браунита; Торта от моркови; Чийзкейк; Шоколадова торта; Бисквитки; Крамбъл; Крем брюле; Меденки; Макарони; Целувка; Блокчета с мюсли; Мъфини; Палачинки; Кори за пай; Тесто за пица; Селски хляб; Shortbread; Вафли; Други
el: Σκοπός ψησίματος: Μπισκότα; Ψωμί; Μπράουνι; Κέικ καρότου; Τσίζκεϊκ; Κέικ σοκολάτας; Μπισκότα; Κραμπλ; Κρεμ μπρουλέ; Μελόψωμο; Μακαρόν; Μαρέγγα; Μπάρες από μούσλι; Μάφιν; Τηγανίτες; Ζύμη πίτας; Ζύμη για πίτσα; Χωριάτικο ψωμί; Μπισκότα βουτύρου; Βάφλες; Άλλο
ko: 베이킹 용도: 비스킷; 빵; 브라우니; 당근 케이크; 치즈케이크; 초코 케이크; 쿠키; 크럼블; 크렘 브륄레; 진저브레드; 마카롱; 머랭; 뮤즐리 바; 머핀; 팬케이크; 파이 크러스트; 피자 도우; 루스틱 빵; 쇼트브레드; 와플; 기타
ru: Тип выпечки: Галеты; Хлеб; Брауни; Морковный пирог; Чизкейк; Шоколадный торт; Печенье; Посыпка; Крем-брюле; Пряники; Макаруны; Безе; Батончики-мюсли; Маффины; Блины; Основа для пирога; Тесто для пиццы; Деревенский хлеб; Песочное печенье; Вафли; Другое